Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-309 Effect of payment to surplus
lines broker. Payment of a premium to a surplus lines broker acting for a
person other than the surplus lines broker in negotiating, continuing, or
reviewing any policy of insurance under this part shall be deemed to be payment
to the insurer, notwithstanding whatever conditions or stipulations may be
inserted in the policy or contract. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next